Idaho statutes. Title 53 PARTNERSHIP
Chapter 2
UNIFORM LIMITED PARTNERSHIP ACT

Part 1. General Provisions

Sec.

Part 2. Formation — Certificate of Limited Partnership and Other Filings

Part 3. Limited Partners

Part 4. General Partners

Part 5. Contributions and Distributions

Part 6. Dissociation

Part 7. Transferable Interests and Rights of Transferees and Creditors

Part 8. Dissolution

Part 9. Foreign Limited Partnerships

Part 10. Actions By Partners

Part 11. Conversion and Merger

Part 12. Miscellaneous Provisions